Hawaii, session 2025, SB162.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The Hawaii Revised Statutes is amended by adding a new chapter to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "Chapter Hawaii state fellows program §   -1  Definitions.  As used in this chapter: "Department" means the department of human resources development. "Program" means the Hawaii state fellows program. "State agency" means the executive, legislative, or judicial branches of state government, including departments, offices, divisions, or other agencies within the executive, legislative, or judicial branches. §   -2  Hawaii state fellows program; established.  (a) There is established within the department the Hawaii state fellows program to match talented applicants with full-time, paid fellowship roles in various state agencies for a period of ten to eleven months to attract and retain government workers in the State. (b) The program shall include but not be limited to the following: (1)  Full-time, paid employment opportunities for eligible applicants to work on a broad range of public policy issues and projects within various state agencies for a period of ten to eleven months; (2)  Career and leadership skills development trainings, workshops, and seminars; (3)  A mentorship program structure; and (4)  Feedback and evaluation mechanisms to allow fellows, participating state agencies, and other stakeholders to assess the effectiveness of the program in achieving its goals. (c) The department, in consultation with the department of labor and industrial relations, shall coordinate with state agencies to: (1)  Establish full-time, paid fellowship roles to be offered through the program that offer professional development and hands-on experience in state governance; (2)  Establish administrative policies and procedures for the implementation of the program and the integration of fellowship roles into the state government workflow; (3)  Promote the program; and (4)  Recruit eligible applicants. (d) The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 necessary for the purposes of this chapter. §   -3  Hawaii state fellows program; minimum qualifications; preference.  (a)  To be eligible for the program, applicants shall meet the following minimum qualifications: (1)  Completed a bachelor's degree by September 1 of the fellowship year; (2)  Earned a cumulative undergraduate grade point average of 2.5 or higher or a grade point average of 2.5 or higher in the last sixty semester units or ninety quarter units; (3)  Be twenty years of age or older by September 1 of the fellowship year; (4)  Be capable and prepared for full-time employment; and (5)  Be authorized to work in the United States for the duration of the fellowship program; provided that an applicant who is not a United States citizen shall provide proof of appropriate immigration status.  An applicant that requires a F-1 or J-1 work visa, or any work permit requiring participation in the E-Verify employment eligibility verification system, shall not be eligible for the program. (b) To apply for the program, eligible applicants shall submit: (1)  A completed online application; (2)  A personal statement or policy statement that addresses the applicant's commitment to serving the State; (3)  A resume; (4)  The names of three individuals who will serve as references; (5)  A minimum of two letters of recommendation; and (6)  Transcripts from each college and university attended. (c) The department shall give preference to eligible program applicants that have: (1)  Pre-existing ties to the State; or (2)  A demonstrated commitment to long-term leadership in the State." SECTION 2. The department of human resources development shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2026 on the status and results of the Hawaii state fellows program, including: (1)  The number of fellows that applied and participated in the program; (2)  Key accomplishments of the program; and (3)  The budget and expenditures of the program. SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the Hawaii state fellows program. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of human resources development for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________